Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1502.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 933(a)(1)(ii) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 933. Appeals from government agencies.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise prescribed by any general rule adopted pursuant to section 503 (relating to reassignment of matters), each court of common pleas shall have jurisdiction of appeals from final orders of government agencies in the following cases:(1) Appeals from Commonwealth agencies in the following cases:* * *123456789101112131415161718192021 (ii) Determinations of the Department of Transportation appealable under the following provisions of Title 75 (relating to vehicles):Section 1377 (relating to judicial review).Section 1550 (relating to judicial review).Section 4724(b) (relating to [judicial review)] revocation, suspension, denial or nonrenewal of certificates of appointment).Section 7303(b) (relating to [judicial review)] suspension of authorization).Section 7503(b) (relating to judicial review).Except as otherwise prescribed by general rules, the venue shall be in the county of the principal place of business of any salvor or messenger service, the location of any inspection station involved, the county where the arrest for a violation of 75 Pa.C.S. § 3802 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance) was made in appeals involving the suspension of operating privileges under 75 Pa.C.S. § 1547 (relating to chemical testing to determine amount of alcohol or controlled substance) or the residence of any individual appellant where the venue is not otherwise fixed by this sentence. In the case of a nonresident individual venue, except as otherwise prescribed by general rules, shall be in the county in which the offense giving rise to the recall, cancellation, suspension or revocation of operating privileges occurred.* * *Section 2. Section 4523 of Title 75 is amended by adding subsections to read:20250HB1502PN1757 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4523. Exhaust systems, mufflers and noise control.* * *(f) Unauthorized sale, installation or operation of modified mufflers and related equipment prohibited.--(1) A person may not sell, offer for sale, install, equip or operate:(i) The muffler or exhaust system of a motor vehicle with a cut-out, bypass or a similar device that amplifies or increases the noise emitted by the motor or exhaust system originally installed on the vehicle.(ii) A motorcycle exhaust device without internal baffles, known as straight pipes.(iii) A motorcycle exhaust device that is intentionally designed to allow for the internal baffling to be fully or partially removed or interchangeable or that has been modified in a manner that amplifies or increases the noise emitted by the motor or exhaust system originally installed on the motorcycle. This subparagraph shall not apply to a motorcycle manufactured or assembled before January 1, 1979, any competition motorcycle as defined in 40 CFR 205.151 (relating to definitions) or exempted under 40 CFR 1068.235 (relating to exempting nonroad engines/equipment used solely for competition) or any aftermarket exhaust system or muffler that is compliant with Federal requirements or 75 Pa.C.S. § 7743 (relating to mufflers and sound control).(2) A motor vehicle that is operated or equipped with an exhaust system or muffler in violation of this section shall fail a safety inspection at a licensed Official Inspection Station.20250HB1502PN1757 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A person violating the provisions of this subsection commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $1,000 or to undergo imprisonment for not more than 30 days.(g) Enforcement and training.--The department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania State Police and relevant State agencies, shall develop and implement training materials and procedures for law enforcement officers and licensed safety inspection personnel to identify noncompliant exhaust systems. The procedures may include visual inspection standards, reference recordings of factory exhaust systems and the use of approved mobile sound meter applications.(h) Noncompliant systems installed outside this Commonwealth.--It shall be unlawful to operate or equip a motor vehicle in this Commonwealth with an exhaust system or muffler that violates this section, regardless of whether the system was installed within or outside this Commonwealth or prior to the current owner's acquisition of the vehicle.(i) Audibility standard.--A motor vehicle shall be deemed to be in violation of subsection (a) if the exhaust system emits sound clearly audible at a distance of 200 feet or more under normal road conditions. The department shall establish specific procedures and criteria for enforcement of this subsection by regulation.Section 3. Section 4724 heading, (a) and (b) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 4724. [Suspension] Revocation, suspension, denial or nonrenewal of certificates of appointment.(a) General rule.--(1) The department shall supervise and inspect official 20250HB1502PN1757 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 inspection stations and may revoke, suspend or refuse to renew the certificate of appointment issued to a station or may impose a monetary penalty or may issue a warning against the station which it finds is not properly equipped or conducted or which has violated or failed to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted by the department.(2) The department shall revoke, suspend or refuse to renew the certificate of appointment for an inspection station upon a third or subsequent violation, within a period of 18 months, of a regulation requiring the inspection station to inspect the muffler or exhaust system of a motor vehicle for the purpose of compliance with section 4523 (relating to exhaust systems, mufflers and noise control). The department shall attribute a violation of section 4523 by an employee of an inspection station, garage or repair shop to the station, garage or repair shop. A fine paid under section 4523 shall be in addition to, but not in lieu of, a monetary penalty, revocation, suspension or nonrenewal of a certificate of appointment imposed under this chapter.(3) A schedule of all penalties, points and suspension may be established by the department by publishing a notice in the Pennsylvania Bulletin until the regulations governing these penalties are promulgated by the department. The department shall maintain a list of all stations holding certificates of appointment and of those whose certificates of appointment have been revoked, suspended or not renewed. Any revoked, suspended or not renewed certificate of appointment and all unused certificates of inspection shall be returned immediately to the department.20250HB1502PN1757 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Judicial review.--Any person whose mechanic certificate issued under section 4726 (relating to certification of mechanics) or certificate of appointment has been denied [or], revoked, suspended or not renewed or who has received a monetary penalty under this chapter shall have the right to appeal to the court vested with jurisdiction of such appeals by or pursuant to Title 42 (relating to judiciary and judicial procedure). The court shall set the matter for hearing upon 60 days' written notice to the department and take testimony and examine into the facts of the case and determine whether the petitioner is entitled to a mechanic certificate or certificate of appointment or is subject to revocation, suspension or nonrenewal or a monetary penalty under the provisions of this chapter.* * *Section 4. Section 7743 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7743. Mufflers and sound control.* * *(d) Penalties.--A person who violates this section commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $1,000 or to be imprisoned for not more than 30 days, or both.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1502PN1757 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223